Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 11. Mississippi Home Corporation Act.
§ 43-33-719.
Loan requirements; purchase of loans.

In connection with the making of any of the types of loans authorized by this article to any entity the corporation:

May require that the borrower issue and deliver to the corporation an evidence of its indebtedness to the corporation (which evidence shall constitute a general obligation of the borrower as the corporation shall determine) which shall contain such provisions consistent with this section as the corporation shall determine, including but not limited to, date, time of maturing and prepayment clause;

May require that the interest rate or rates and other terms of such loans or any collection of such loans made from the proceeds of any issue of bonds or notes of the corporation shall, together with any other monies available therefor, including reserve funds, be at least sufficient to assure the payment of such bonds or notes and the interest thereon as the same become due;

May require that loans made pursuant to this section be secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of collateral security of such type and in such amounts as the corporation shall determine to be useful to assure the payment of such loans and the interest thereon as the same become due, and in the case of loans to institutional lenders, such collateral security shall consist of:

Direct or guaranteed obligations of the United States of America;

Obligations of any municipality or the state or any state agency;

Mortgage loans insured by the Federal Housing Administration or guaranteed by the Veterans Administration and such other mortgages insured or guaranteed by the federal government or by a private insurer as to payment of principal and interest as shall be approved by the corporation; or

Conventional mortgage loans approved by the corporation;

May require that any collateral for loans be deposited with a bank or trust company or other financial institution acceptable to the corporation located in the state and designated by the corporation as custodian therefor. The corporation may also require the entity receiving such loan to enter into an agreement with the corporation containing such provisions as the corporation shall deem necessary to: (i) adequately identify and maintain such collateral; (ii) service such collateral, if appropriate; and (iii) require such entity to hold such collateral as an agent for the corporation and be accountable to the corporation as the trustee of an express trust for the application and disposition thereof and the income therefrom. In the case of loans to institutional lenders, the corporation shall require the lender to enter into such an agreement;

May also establish such additional requirements as it shall deem necessary with respect to the pledging, assigning, setting aside or holding of such collateral and the making of substitutions therefor or additions thereto and the disposition of income and receipts therefrom;

Shall require as a condition of each loan that the borrower, within a prescribed period after receipt, shall have disbursed or applied the loan proceeds for the purposes for which the loan was made in an aggregate principal amount equal to the amount of such loan;

May require the submission to it by each borrower of evidence satisfactory to the corporation of compliance with the terms of such loan, and in connection therewith may, through its members, employees or agents, inspect any books and records of any such entity;

May require, as a condition of any loans, representations and warranties deemed necessary to secure the loans and carry out the purpose of this section;

May enforce compliance with the terms of its agreement with any entity by decree of any court of competent jurisdiction. The corporation may require, as a condition of any loan to any national banking association, the consent of such association to the jurisdiction of courts of this state over any proceeding. The corporation may also require, as a condition of any such loan, agreement by such entity to the payment of penalties to the corporation for violation of its undertakings to the corporation, and such penalties shall be recoverable at the suit of the corporation; and

To the extent that any provisions of this section may be inconsistent with any provision of law of the state governing the affairs of mortgage lenders, the provisions hereof shall control.

In connection with the purchase from any lender of any of the types of loans authorized by this article, or any portion thereof or any participation therein, the corporation:

May require as a condition of purchase of such loans either:

That such loans be mortgage loans owned by the mortgage lenders and that such mortgage lenders, within a prescribed period after receipt of the purchase price, shall enter into written commitments to loan and, within a prescribed period thereafter, may loan an amount not to exceed the entire purchase price of such purchased loans on new loans, which new loans shall have such terms and conditions as the corporation may prescribe by regulation; or

That such purchased loans qualify as new loans and were originated by the lenders for the purpose of selling them to the corporation;

Shall require the submission to it, by each mortgage lender from which the corporation has purchased existing loans, evidence satisfactory to the corporation of the making of new loans as required by the corporation, and in connection therewith may, through its members, employees or agents, inspect the books and records of any such mortgage lender;

May enforce compliance by any mortgage lender with the terms of its agreement with or undertaking to the corporation with respect to the making of any new loans by decree of any court of competent jurisdiction. The corporation may require as a condition of purchase of loans from any national banking association the consent of such association to the jurisdiction of courts of this state over any such proceeding. The corporation may also require, as a condition of the corporation’s purchase of loans, agreement by any mortgage lender to the payment of penalties to the corporation for violation by the mortgage lender of its undertakings to the corporation, and such penalties shall be recoverable at the suit of the corporation;

May require as a condition of purchase of any loan from a mortgage lender that the mortgage lender represent and warrant to the corporation that: (i) the unpaid principal balance of such loan and this interest rate thereon have been accurately stated to the corporation; (ii) the amount of the unpaid balance is justly due and owing in accordance with the terms thereof; (iii) the mortgage lender has no notice of the existence of any counterclaim, offset or defense asserted by the maker or his successor in interest; (iv) such loan is evidenced by a bond or promissory note and a mortgage which has been properly recorded with the appropriate public official; (v) the mortgage constitutes a valid lien on the real property described to the corporation subject only to such liens, reservations, exceptions or encumbrances as may be permitted by the rules or regulations of the corporation; (vi) the maker is not now in default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest, escrow funds, taxes or otherwise in the performance of his obligations under the mortgage or loan documents and has not, to the knowledge of the mortgage lender, been in default in the performance of any such obligations for a period of longer than sixty (60) days during the life thereof; (vii) the improvements to mortgaged real property are permanently affixed thereto and the real property together with improvements thereon are covered by a valid and subsisting policy of insurance issued by a company authorized to issue such policies in this state and providing fire and extended coverage in such amounts as the corporation may prescribe by regulation; and (viii), in the case of mortgage loans, the mortgage loan meets the prevailing investment quality standards for mortgage loans of that type in the state;

May require that each mortgage lender be liable to the corporation for any damages suffered by the corporation by reason of any misrepresentation or the breach of any warranty, and in the event that any representation shall prove to be untrue when made or in the event of any breach of warranty, the mortgage lender shall, at the option of the corporation, repurchase the loan for the original purchase price adjusted for amounts subsequently paid thereon, as the corporation may determine;

Shall not be required to inspect or take possession of the loan mortgage or documents if the mortgage lender from which the loan is purchased by the corporation shall enter into a contract to service such loan and account to the corporation therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-721.
Adoption of rules, regulations, resolutions and bylaws by corporation.

The corporation shall adopt, and may from time to time modify or repeal, rules, regulations, resolutions and bylaws on issues including, but not limited to the following:

Income levels for the classification of persons of low or moderate income in accordance with the factors set forth in the definition of persons of low or moderate income in Section 43-33-703; however, any such rules shall set as a priority the needs of very low and low income persons;

The making of loans and the purchase of mortgage loans, to implement the powers authorized and to achieve the purposes set forth in this article;

Setting schedules of any fees and charges to be imposed by the corporation;

Where intended, assuring that the interest on its bonds or notes qualifies for tax exemption under applicable federal laws; and

Any other matters related to the duties and the exercise of the powers of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-723.
Prohibition against discrimination.

No person shall be discriminated against because of race, religious principles, color, sex, national origin, ancestry or handicap by the corporation, any qualified sponsor, any lender, or any agent or employee thereof in connection with any housing development or eligible loan. No person shall be discriminated against because of age, nor shall any family be discriminated against because of children, in admission to, or continuance of occupancy in, any housing project receiving assistance under this article except for any housing project constructed under a program restricting occupancy to persons sixty-two (62) years of age or older and any directors of their immediate households or their occupant surviving spouses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-725.
Advisory board.

The corporation may, if it deems necessary, create an advisory board to the corporation to assist in the furtherance of the purposes of this article. The corporation shall determine the size, structure and powers and duties of the advisory board. The members of the advisory board shall be appointed by the Governor for the terms set by the corporation and shall serve without compensation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-727.
Mississippi Home Corporation Oversight Committee.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Home Corporation Oversight Committee. Such oversight committee shall consist of five (5) Senators appointed by the President of the Senate and five (5) Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall serve in an advisory capacity to the corporation. The members thereof shall report the actions of the corporation to the appropriate legislative committees. The oversight committee shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the corporation. When the Legislature is not in session, members shall be paid per diem and all actual and necessary expenses, including mileage expenses, from their respective contingent expense funds at the rate authorized for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses will be paid when the Legislature is in session. The terms of the members of the oversight committee shall expire at the end of their terms of office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-729.
Issuance of negotiable bonds and notes; purpose.

[Through June 30, 2021, this section shall read as follows:]

The corporation may from time to time issue its negotiable bonds and notes in such principal amounts as, in the opinion of the corporation, shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving the corporate purposes thereof, including operating expenses and reserves, the payment of interest on bonds and notes of the corporation, establishment of reserves to secure such bonds and notes, and all other expenditures of the corporation incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. Provided, except as otherwise authorized herein, bonds and notes may be issued annually under this article in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed Three Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($350,000,000.00), excluding bonds and notes issued to refund outstanding bonds and notes, bonds and notes in which the corporation acts as a conduit issuer and bonds and notes issued for purposes related to Hurricane Katrina. Such annual period shall be the same as the fiscal year of the state, commencing with the annual period of July 1, 2009, to June 30, 2010.

The provisions of Sections 75-71-1 through 75-71-57, Mississippi Code of 1972 (the “Mississippi Securities Act”), shall not apply to bonds and notes issued under the authority of this article, and no application for a formal exemption from the provisions of such act shall be required with respect to such bonds and notes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the corporation, all bonds and notes issued by the corporation shall be general obligations of the corporation, secured by the full faith and credit of the corporation and payable out of any monies, assets or revenues of the corporation, subject only to any agreement with the bondholders or noteholders pledging any particular monies, assets or revenues.

The corporation may issue bonds or notes to which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the revenues of the corporation resulting from the use of the proceeds of such bonds or notes; or

Exclusively from any particular revenues of the corporation, whether or not resulting from the use of the proceeds of such bonds or notes.

Any bonds or notes issued by the corporation may be additionally secured:

By private insurance, by a direct pay or standby letter of credit, or by any other credit enhancement facility procured by the corporation for the payment of any such bonds;

By a pledge of any grant, subsidy or contribution from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the state or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, or from any person, firm or corporation; or

By the pledge of any securities, funds or reserves (or earnings thereon) available to the corporation.

Bonds and notes issued by the corporation shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions of the corporation adopted as provided for by this article; provided, that any such resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes may delegate to an officer or officers of the corporation the power to issue such bonds or notes from time to time and to fix the details of any such issues of bonds or notes by an appropriate certification of such authorized officer.

Except as specifically provided in this article, no notice, consent or approval by any governmental body or public officer shall be required as a prerequisite to the issuance, sale or delivery of any bonds or notes of the corporation pursuant to the provisions of this article. However, all bonds or notes issued pursuant to this article may be validated, except as otherwise provided in this section, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, in the same manner as provided therein for bonds issued by a municipality. Any such validation proceedings shall be held in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. Notice thereof shall be given by publication in any newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and of general circulation throughout the state.

It is hereby determined that the corporation is the sole entity in the state authorized to issue bonds or notes for the purposes of financing low and moderate income rental or residential housing as set forth in this article. In addition, the corporation shall have the power to issue mortgage credit certificates, as provided by Section 25 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and to comply with all of the terms and conditions set forth in Section 25, as the same may be amended from time to time.

History.
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 16; Laws, 1993, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2014); Laws, 2019, ch. 400, § 1; § 1; Laws, 2019, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after June 30, 2019.

§ 43-33-729.
Issuance of negotiable bonds and notes; purpose.

[From and after July 1, 2021, this section shall read as follows:]

The corporation may from time to time issue its negotiable bonds and notes in such principal amounts as, in the opinion of the corporation, shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving the corporate purposes thereof, including operating expenses and reserves, the payment of interest on bonds and notes of the corporation, establishment of reserves to secure such bonds and notes, and all other expenditures of the corporation incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. Provided, except as otherwise authorized herein, bonds and notes shall not be issued under this article in an aggregate principal amount exceeding the aggregate principal amount of bonds and notes outstanding on July 1, 2021, excluding bonds and notes issued to refund outstanding bonds and notes, bonds and notes in which the corporation acts as a conduit issuer and bonds and notes issued for purposes related to Hurricane Katrina.

The provisions of Sections 75-71-1 through 75-71-57, Mississippi Code of 1972 (the “Mississippi Securities Act”), shall not apply to bonds and notes issued under the authority of this article, and no application for a formal exemption from the provisions of such act shall be required with respect to such bonds and notes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the corporation, all bonds and notes issued by the corporation shall be general obligations of the corporation, secured by the full faith and credit of the corporation and payable out of any monies, assets or revenues of the corporation, subject only to any agreement with the bondholders or noteholders pledging any particular monies, assets or revenues.

The corporation may issue bonds or notes to which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the revenues of the corporation resulting from the use of the proceeds of such bonds or notes; or

Exclusively from any particular revenues of the corporation, whether or not resulting from the use of the proceeds of such bonds or notes.

Any bonds or notes issued by the corporation may be additionally secured:

By private insurance, by a direct pay or standby letter of credit, or by any other credit enhancement facility procured by the corporation for the payment of any such bonds;

By a pledge of any grant, subsidy or contribution from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the state or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, or from any person, firm or corporation; or

By the pledge of any securities, funds or reserves (or earnings thereon) available to the corporation.

Bonds and notes issued by the corporation shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions of the corporation adopted as provided for by this article; provided, that any such resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes may delegate to an officer or officers of the corporation the power to issue such bonds or notes from time to time and to fix the details of any such issues of bonds or notes by an appropriate certification of such authorized officer.

Except as specifically provided in this article, no notice, consent or approval by any governmental body or public officer shall be required as a prerequisite to the issuance, sale or delivery of any bonds or notes of the corporation pursuant to the provisions of this article. However, all bonds or notes issued pursuant to this article may be validated, except as otherwise provided in this section, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, in the same manner as provided therein for bonds issued by a municipality. Any such validation proceedings shall be held in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. Notice thereof shall be given by publication in any newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and of general circulation throughout the state.

It is hereby determined that the corporation is the sole entity in the state authorized to issue bonds or notes for the purposes of financing low and moderate income rental or residential housing as set forth in this article. In addition, the corporation shall have the power to issue mortgage credit certificates, as provided by Section 25 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and to comply with all of the terms and conditions set forth in Section 25, as the same may be amended from time to time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 16; Laws, 1993, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2014); Laws, 2019, ch. 400, § 1; § 1; Laws, 2019, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2021.

§ 43-33-731.
Form and content of bonds and notes.

Bonds and notes of the corporation shall:

State on the face thereof that they:

Are payable both as to principal and interest solely out of the assets of the corporation; and

Do not constitute an obligation, either general or special, of the state or municipality or any other political subdivision of the state; and

Be:

Either registered, registered as to principal only or in coupon form;

Issued in such denominations as the corporation may prescribe;

Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of the state;

Signed on behalf of the corporation with the manual or facsimile signature of the chairman or vice-chairman, attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary, and have impressed or imprinted thereon the seal of the corporation or a facsimile thereof, and the coupons attached thereto shall be signed with the facsimile signature of such chairman or vice-chairman. If the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on any bonds, notes or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, notes or coupons, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery;

Payable as to principal at such time or times, at such place or places, and with such reserved rights of prior redemption as the corporation may determine or provide;

Payable as to interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed a greater rate to maturity than that established in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972) and at such time or times as the corporation may determine or provide;

Sold at such price or prices, at public or private sale, and in such manner as the corporation may prescribe; and the corporation may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which it deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof; and

Issued under and subject to such terms, conditions and covenants providing for the payment of the principal, redemption premiums, if any, and interest and such other terms, conditions, covenants and protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with this article, as may be found to be necessary by the corporation for the most advantageous sale thereof, which may include, but not be limited to, covenants with the holders of the bonds or the notes, as to:

1. Pledging or creating a lien, to the extent provided by such resolution or resolutions, on all or any part of any money or property of the corporation or of any monies held in trust or otherwise by others to secure the payments of such bonds or notes;

2. Otherwise providing for the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any money of or due to the corporation;

3. The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation or disposition thereof;

4. Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of such bonds or notes then or thereafter to be issued may be applied;

5. Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes and on the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

6. The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

7. The creation of special funds into which any money of the corporation may be deposited;

8. Vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the corporation may determine, which may include any or all of the usual and customary rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed for the holders of any issue of bonds or notes as agreed upon by the corporation;

9. Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the corporation and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of bonds or notes in the event of such default; provided, that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of the state and other provisions of this article; and

10. Any other matters of like or different character, which in any way affect the security and protection of the bonds or notes and the rights of the holders thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-733.
Issuance of bonds or notes for refunding outstanding bonds or notes.

The corporation is authorized to issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any bonds or notes of the corporation then outstanding. In addition, the corporation may issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any bonds or notes of (a) any local housing authority or authorities, or (b) any regional housing authority or authorities. The corporation shall have no power or authority to issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding bonds or notes of any local housing authority or any regional housing authority unless the refunding and the corporation’s participation therein are authorized by a resolution or resolutions adopted by the housing authority or authorities whose bonds or notes will be refunded by the bonds or notes issued by the corporation. The resolution or resolutions shall request the corporation to issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding bonds or notes of the housing authority or authorities then outstanding and shall contain such other terms and conditions as necessary or appropriate. The total amount of any such refunding bonds or notes shall be an amount sufficient to effect the refunding and may include an amount sufficient to pay (a) the principal amount of the refunded bonds or notes, (b) interest accrued or to accrue to the date of maturity or the date of redemption of the bonds or notes to be refunded which need not necessarily be on the first available redemption date, (c) any redemption premiums to be paid thereon, (d) any reasonable expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, and (e) any other reasonable costs deemed necessary by the corporation to effect the refunding. The proceeds of such refunding bonds or notes may be applied in the manner determined by the corporation and may be placed in escrow and invested in the manner and on the terms determined by the corporation. All such bonds or notes shall be refunded in accordance with the Mississippi Bond Refinancing Act, Section 31-27-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 18; Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 43-33-735.
Pledge of earnings, revenues or other assets; liens.

It is the intention of the Legislature that:

Any pledge of earnings, revenues or other assets consistent with the provisions of this article shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made;

Any earnings, revenues or other assets so pledged and thereafter received by the corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act;

Such liens shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the corporation irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof; and

Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-737.
Liability on issuance of bonds or notes.

The directors of the corporation, the advisory committee, or any person executing the bonds, notes or other obligations of the corporation shall not be personally liable for such bonds, notes or other obligations or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof while acting in the scope of their authority.

The bonds, notes and other obligations of the corporation shall not be a debt of the state or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-739.
Creation of debt service reserve funds.

The corporation may create and establish one or more reserve funds to be known as “debt service reserve funds” and the corporation may create and establish such other reserve funds as it shall deem advisable and necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-741.
Agreement by state not to alter vested rights.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds or notes issued under this article that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the corporation to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders thereof in keeping with the provisions of this article, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such bonds or notes together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged. The corporation is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of such bonds or notes. The chancery court shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action or proceeding by the trustee on behalf of bondholders or noteholders. The venue of any such suit, action or proceeding shall be in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-743.
Investment in sinking funds, monies or other funds.

The state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries and the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System may legally invest any sinking funds, monies or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or notes issued by the corporation, and such bonds or notes shall be authorized security for all public deposits, it being the purpose of this article to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including, but not limited to, sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or notes, and that any such bonds or notes shall be authorized security for all public deposits. However, nothing contained in this article with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-745.
Purpose for creation of corporation; covenants; immunity from taxation.

It is hereby determined that the creation of the corporation is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the improvement of their health and welfare and for the protection of the economy, and that such purposes are public purposes and the corporation will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon the corporation by this article. In consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the bonds and notes issued by the corporation pursuant to this article, the state hereby covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of such bonds and notes that the income from such bonds and notes shall at all times be free from taxation, except for estate or gift taxes and taxes on transfers.

The corporation may issue bonds or notes designated as taxable bonds or notes, and any immunity to taxation by the United States government of income from bonds or notes so designated is hereby waived.

The income and operations of the corporation shall be exempt from taxation of every kind and nature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-747.
Deposit of monies; withdrawals; audits; fees; reports.

All money of the corporation from whatever source derived, except as otherwise authorized or provided in this article, shall be deposited with one or more qualified depositories of the state as approved by the State Depository Commission and designated by the corporation or invested in accordance with Section 43-33-717(5)(e). The money in such accounts shall be withdrawn on the order of such person or persons as the corporation may authorize. All deposits of such money shall, if required by the corporation, be secured in such manner as the corporation may determine. The State Auditor and his legally authorized representatives are authorized and empowered from time to time to examine the accounts and books of the corporation, including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, leases, sinking funds, investments and any other record and papers relating to its financial standing; at a minimum an audit shall be made annually and a copy thereof shall be filed with the State Treasurer; the corporation shall pay such reasonable fee for such examination as the State Auditor shall determine.

The corporation shall have power to contract with holders of any of its bonds or notes as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any money of the corporation, of any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes, and to carry out such contract. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes or in any way to secure bonds or notes and deposits of such money may be secured in the same manner as money of the corporation, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

Subject to the provisions of any contract with bondholders or noteholders and to the approval of the Department of Audit, the corporation shall prescribe a system of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP).

The corporation shall submit to the Governor, State Auditor and both houses of the Legislature, an annual report on the activities of the corporation and, within thirty (30) days of the receipt thereof by the corporation, a copy of the report of every external examination of the books and accounts of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-749.
Personal liability of corporate directors, advisory board members, etc. while acting in scope of authority.

Neither the directors of the corporation, the advisory board, nor any person or persons acting in their behalf, while acting within the scope of their authority, shall be subject to any personal liability resulting from carrying out any of the powers granted herein in accordance with his or her good faith belief that he or she is acting in the best interests of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-751.
Conflict of interest; disclosure.

The directors shall comply with the provisions of Section 25-4-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 27; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2000.).

§ 43-33-753.
Services of state officers and state agencies.

All state officers and all state agencies are hereby empowered to render such services to the corporation within their respective functions as may be requested by the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-755.
Preference of certain actions or proceedings questioning validity; venue.

Any action or proceeding to which the corporation or the people of the state may be a part in which any question arises as to the validity of this article shall be preferred over all other civil causes in all courts of the state and shall be heard and determined in preference to all other civil business pending therein irrespective of position on the calendar. The same preference shall be granted upon application of counsel to the corporation in any action or proceeding questioning the validity of the article in which he may be allowed to intervene. The venue of any such action or proceeding shall be in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1989.